Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-144.03
Workers' compensation insurance policy; master policy obtained by professional employer organization; notice of cancellation or nonrenewal; termination of coverage; notice; effective date.

(1) Notwithstanding policy provisions that stipulate a workers' compensation insurance policy to be a contract with a fixed term of coverage that expires at the end of the term, coverage under a workers' compensation insurance policy shall continue in full force and effect until notice is given in accordance with this section.

(2)(a) This subsection applies to workers' compensation policies other than master policies or multiple coordinated policies obtained by a professional employer organization.

(b) No cancellation of a policy within the policy period shall be effective unless notice of the cancellation is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the compensation court and to the employer. No such cancellation shall be effective until thirty days after giving such notices, except that the cancellation may be effective ten days after the giving of such notices if such cancellation is based on (i) notice from the employer to the insurer to cancel the policy, (ii) nonpayment of premium due the insurer under any policy written by the insurer for the employer, or (iii) failure of the employer to reimburse deductible losses as required under any policy written by the insurer for the employer.

(c) No policy shall expire or lapse at the end of the policy period unless notice of nonrenewal is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the compensation court and to the employer. No policy shall expire or lapse until thirty days after giving such notices, except that a policy may expire or lapse ten days after the giving of such notices if the nonrenewal is based on (i) notice from the employer to the insurer to not renew the policy, (ii) nonpayment of premium due the insurer under any policy written by the insurer for the employer, or (iii) failure of the employer to reimburse deductible losses as required under any policy written by the insurer for the employer.

(3)(a) This subsection applies to workers' compensation master policies obtained by a professional employer organization.

(b) No cancellation of a master policy within the policy period shall be effective unless notice of the cancellation is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the compensation court and to the professional employer organization. No such cancellation shall be effective until thirty days after giving such notices.

(c) No termination of coverage for a client or any employees of a client under a master policy within the policy period shall be effective unless notice is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the compensation court and to the professional employer organization. No such termination of coverage shall be effective until thirty days after giving such notices, except that the termination of coverage may be effective ten days after the giving of such notices if such termination is based on (i) notice from the client to the professional employer organization or the insurer to terminate the coverage or (ii) notice from the professional employer organization of the client's nonpayment of premium.

(d) No master policy shall expire or lapse at the end of the policy period unless notice of nonrenewal is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the compensation court and to the professional employer organization. No master policy shall expire or lapse until thirty days after giving such notices.

(e) Notice of the cancellation or nonrenewal of a master policy or the termination of coverage for a client or the employees of a client under such a policy shall be given by the professional employer organization to the client within fifteen days after the cancellation, nonrenewal, or termination unless replacement coverage has been obtained.

(4)(a) This subsection applies to workers' compensation multiple coordinated policies obtained by a professional employer organization.

(b) No cancellation of a policy within the policy period shall be effective unless notice of the cancellation is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the compensation court, to the professional employer organization, and to the client employer. No such cancellation shall be effective until thirty days after giving such notices, except that the cancellation may be effective ten days after giving such notices if such cancellation is based on (i) notice from the client to the professional employer organization or the insurer to cancel the policy, (ii) notice from the professional employer organization of the client's nonpayment of premium or failure to reimburse deductibles for policies issued pursuant to section 48-146.03, or (iii) for policies issued pursuant to section 44-3,158, nonpayment of premium or failure to reimburse deductibles for policies issued pursuant to section 48-146.03.

(c) No termination of coverage for any employees of the client during the policy period shall be effective unless notice is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the compensation court, to the professional employer organization, and to the client. No such termination of coverage shall be effective until thirty days after giving such notices, except that the termination of coverage may be effective ten days after the giving of such notices if such termination is based on (i) notice from the client to the professional employer organization or the insurer to terminate the coverage or (ii) notice from the professional employer organization of the client's nonpayment of premium or failure to reimburse deductibles for policies issued pursuant to section 48-146.03.

(d) No policy shall expire or lapse at the end of the policy period unless notice of nonrenewal is given by the workers' compensation insurer to the compensation court, to the professional employer organization, and to the client. No policy shall expire or lapse until thirty days after giving such notices, except that a policy may expire or lapse ten days after the giving of such notices if the nonrenewal is based on (i) notice from the client to the professional employer organization or the insurer to not renew the policy, (ii) notice from the professional employer organization of the client's nonpayment of premium or failure to reimburse deductibles for policies issued pursuant to section 48-146.03, or (iii) for policies issued pursuant to section 44-3,158, nonpayment of premium or failure to reimburse deductibles for policies issued pursuant to section 48-146.03.

(e) An insurer may refrain from sending notices required by this subsection to a professional employer organization's client based upon the professional employer organization's representation that coverage has been or will be replaced. Such representation shall not absolve the insurer of its responsibility to continue coverage if such representation proves inaccurate.

(5) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, if replacement workers' compensation insurance coverage has been secured with another workers' compensation insurer, then the cancellation or nonrenewal of the policy or the termination of coverage for a client or employees of a client under the policy shall be effective as of the effective date of such other insurance coverage.

(6) The notices required by this section shall state the reason for the cancellation or nonrenewal of the policy or termination of coverage for a client or employees of a client under a policy.

(7) The notices required by this section shall be provided in writing and shall be deemed given upon the mailing of such notices by certified mail, except that notices from insurers to the compensation court may be provided by electronic means if such electronic means is approved by the administrator of the compensation court. If notice is provided by electronic means pursuant to such an approval, it shall be deemed given upon receipt and acceptance by the compensation court.

Laws 1971, LB 572, § 13;

Laws 1972, LB 1269, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 65;

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 49;

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 61;

Laws 1996, LB 1230, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 13, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 238, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 33;

Laws 2009, LB630, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB579, § 15;

Laws 2026, LB397, § 2.
July 18, 2026
Under subsection (10) of this section, an insurer need only prove that it sent a notice of cancellation to an employer by certified mail; the insurer's record of the certified mail tracking number used to send the notice itself was not sufficient to prove certified mail service. Greenwood v. J.J. Hooligan's, 297 Neb. 435, 899 N.W.2d 905 (2017).

Subsection (2) of this section applies only to an insurer's intent to nonrenew a policy and does not address either an employer's intent to not renew a policy for an additional term or nonrenewal by an employer through lapse at the end of the policy period due to the employer's nonpayment of a renewal premium. Brouilette v. DBV Enterprises, Inc., 9 Neb. App. 757, 619 N.W.2d 482 (2000).